Arkansas, session 2025, SB284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-9-508(c) and (d), concerning the system
of managed health care established by the Workers' Compensation Commission,
are amended to read as follows:
(c) In order to help control the cost of medical benefits, the
commission, on or before July 1, 1994, following a public hearing and with
the assistance and cooperation of the State Insurance Department, is
authorized and directed to establish appropriate rules to establish and
implement shall maintain a system of managed health care for the State of
Arkansas.
(d) For the purpose of establishing and implementing a system of
managed health care, the commission is authorized to:
(1) Develop rules for the certification of managed care entities
to provide managed care to injured workers;
(2) Develop rules for peer review, service utilization, and
resolution of medical disputes;
*ANS192*
02/24/2025 4:02:20 PM ANS192

SB284
(3) Prohibit “balance billing” from the employee, employer, or
carrier;
(4)(A) Establish fees for medical services as provided in
Workers' Compensation Commission Rule 30 and its amendments.
(B) The commission shall make no distinction in approving
fees from different classes of medical service providers or healthcare
providers for provision of the same or essentially similar medical services
or healthcare services as specified in this section; and
(5)(A)(i) Give the employer the right to choose the initial
treating physician, with the injured employee having the right to petition
the commission for a one-time-only change of physician to one who is
associated with a managed care entity certified by the commission or is to
encourage continuity of care and improved outcomes, an injured worker has the
right to be treated by the regular treating physician of the employee who
maintains the employee's medical records and with whom the employee has a
bona fide doctor-patient relationship demonstrated by a history of regular
treatment prior to the onset of the compensable injury, but only if the
primary care physician agrees to refer the employee to a certified managed
care entity for any specialized treatment, including physical therapy, and
only if such primary care physician agrees to comply with all the rules,
terms, and conditions regarding services performed by the managed care entity
initially chosen by the employer or otherwise agrees to the commission rules
and fee schedule.
(ii) A treating physician shall make appropriate
referrals to relevant specialists for necessary medical treatment if the
primary care physician agrees to refer the employee to a certified managed
care entity for any specialized treatment.
(iii) In addition to a change to the regular
treating physician under subdivision (d)(5)(A)(i) of this section, no more
than once per year, the injured employee has the right to petition the
commission for a change of treating physician to:
(a) Another treating physician who is
associated with a managed care entity certified by the commission or
otherwise agrees to the commission rules and fee schedule; or
(b) An appropriate specialist physician who is
associated with a managed care entity certified by the commission or
02/24/2025 4:02:20 PM ANS192

SB284
otherwise agrees to the commission rules and fee schedule.
(iv) This subdivision (5)(A) specifically recognizes
that an injured employee may require treatment from multiple specialists and
an injured worker may obtain one (1) change of a specialist physician per
year for each relevant specialty.
(B) A petition for change of physician shall be expedited
by the commission.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-9-508, concerning the employer's
liability for medical services under the Workers' Compensation Law, is
amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g)(1) The employer shall petition the commission for approval of any
independent medical exam.
(2) The petition described in subdivision (g)(1) of this section
shall include the identity of, credentials of, and fees to be paid to the
examiner conducting the independent medical exam and the stated purpose of
the independent medical exam.
(3) All correspondence, records, and reports provided to the
examiner conducting the independent medical exam shall be furnished to the
claimant or claimant's counsel at the time the correspondence, records, and
reports are transmitted to the examiner conducting the independent medical
exam.
(4) A record or report generated by the examiner conducting the
independent medical exam shall be promptly furnished to the claimant or
claimant's counsel.
(5)(A) The claimant has the right to depose the examiner
conducting the independent medical exam.
(B) If the claimant deposes the examiner conducting the
independent medical exam under subdivision (g)(5)(A) of this section, the
claimant shall:
(i) Pay a witness fee to the examiner conducting the
independent medical exam at the rate specified under Commission Rule 099.30
(I)(P); and
(ii) Be responsible for payment of any court
reporter expenses.
(6) This subsection applies to any record review, peer review,
02/24/2025 4:02:20 PM ANS192

SB284
report, second opinion, or consultation obtained by the employer for use in
proceedings before the commission.


































02/24/2025 4:02:20 PM ANS192